District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.41

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 401, 58 DCR 746